Utah statutes.
16-10a-601.   Authorized shares.
(1)  The articles of incorporation must prescribe the classes of shares and
the number of shares of each class that the corporation is authorized to
issue.  If more than one class of shares is authorized, the articles of
incorporation must prescribe a distinguishing designation for each class, and
prior to the issuance of shares of a class the preferences, limitations, and
relative rights of that class must be described in the articles of
incorporation.  All shares of a class must have preferences, limitations, and
relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same class except
to the extent otherwise permitted by this section and Section 16-10a-602.
(2)  The articles of incorporation must authorize:
(a)  one or more classes of shares that together have unlimited voting rights;
and
(b)  one or more classes of shares, which may be the same class or classes as
those with voting rights, that together are entitled to receive the net assets
of the corporation upon dissolution.
(3)  The articles of incorporation may authorize one or more classes of shares
and one or more series of shares within any class that:
(a)  have special, conditional, or limited voting rights, or no right to vote,
except to the extent prohibited by this chapter;
(b)  are redeemable or convertible as specified in the articles of
incorporation:
(i)  at the option of the corporation, the shareholder, or another person or
upon the occurrence of a designated event;
(ii)  for money, indebtedness, securities, or other property; or
(iii)  in a designated amount or in an amount determined in accordance with a
designated formula or by reference to extrinsic data or events;
(c)  entitle the holders to distributions calculated in any manner, including
dividends that may be cumulative, noncumulative, or partially cumulative; or
(d)  have preference over any other class or series of shares with respect to
distributions, including dividends and distributions upon the dissolution of
the corporation.
(4)  The description of the designations, preferences, limitations, and
relative rights of share classes or series of shares in Subsection (3) is not
exhaustive.
